Vermont, session 2025-2026, H395.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 1944 is added to read:
§ 1944. MUNICIPAL LAW ENFORCEMENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
(a) There is created the Municipal Law Enforcement Assistance Program to
provide funding to municipalities for the purpose of establishing, maintaining,
or improving law enforcement presence and operations within a municipality.
The Program and funds within the Program shall be managed by the Judicial
Bureau.
(b) If the legislative body of a municipality by a majority vote
recommends, the voters of a municipality may, at an annual or special meeting
warned for that purpose, by a majority vote, assess a local penalty surcharge of
$75.00 pursuant to this section. A local penalty surcharge shall only be applied
to civil money penalties assessed by the Judicial Bureau for any of the matters
under its jurisdiction pursuant to 4 V.S.A. § 1102. A local penalty surcharge
shall only be applied to civil penalties for violations or offenses committed
within a municipality that has voted to establish a local penalty surcharge.
(c) Within 10 days after an affirmative vote to assess a local penalty
surcharge, the clerk of a municipality shall notify the Judicial Bureau of the
results of the vote and provide a certified copy of the results of the vote. The
local option surcharge shall be effective beginning on the next fiscal year
VT LEG #381118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.395
2025 Page 3 of 4
quarter following 90 days’ notice to the Judicial Bureau pursuant to this
subsection.
(d)(1) Any local penalty surcharge imposed under the authority of this
section shall be collected and administered by the Judicial Bureau. The
Judicial Bureau may retain not more than $5.00 of the local penalty surcharge
to compensate the Judicial Bureau for the costs of administering and collecting
the local penalty surcharge. The fee shall be subject to the provisions of
32 V.S.A. § 605.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law or municipal charter to the contrary,
if the Judicial Bureau determines that a local penalty surcharge was assessed
for a violation or offense in a municipal corporation that has not authorized a
local penalty surcharge under this section, the Judicial Bureau shall refund the
surcharge to the payor of the surcharge.
(e) The monies collected by the Judicial Bureau pursuant to this section
shall be remitted on a quarterly basis to the municipality for which the
surcharge was collected.
(f) A municipality shall use the monies received pursuant to this section
exclusively to establish, support, maintain, or improve law enforcement
services and operations within the municipality.
(g) As used in this section, “municipality” means a city or town.
VT LEG #381118 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.395
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381118 v.1